Utah statutes.
53-3-502.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) (a)  "Commercial driver training school" or "school" means a business
enterprise conducted by an individual, association, partnership, or
corporation for the education and training of persons, either practically or
theoretically, or both, to:
(i)  drive motor vehicles, including motorcycles; and
(ii)  prepare an applicant for an examination given by the state for a license
or learner permit.
(b)  A commercial driver training school may charge a consideration or tuition
for the services described under Subsection (1)(a).
(2) (a)  "Commercial testing only school" means a business enterprise
conducted by an individual, association, partnership, or corporation that:
(i)  is designated by the division as a commercial testing only school;
(ii)  employs instructors who are certified by the division; and
(iii)  engages only in testing students for the purpose of obtaining a driver
license.
(b)  A commercial testing only school may conduct behind-the-wheel or
observation instruction if approved by the division.
(c)  A commercial testing only school may not engage in education or training
of persons, either practically or theoretically, or both to drive motor
vehicles, except when:
(i)  counseling the driver following a test in reference to errors made during
the administration of the test; or
(ii)  conducting behind-the-wheel or observation instruction if approved by
the division.
(d)  A commercial testing only school may not test an individual who has
completed any behind-the-wheel or observation instruction through the school
with which the tester is employed.
(3)  "Instructor" means a person, whether acting as an operator of a
commercial driver training school or for a school for compensation, who:
(a)  teaches, conducts classes of, gives demonstrations to, or supervises
practice of persons learning to drive motor vehicles, including motorcycles;
(b)  prepares persons to take an examination for a license or learner permit;
or
(c)  supervises the work of any other instructor.
(4)  "School operator" means a person who:
(a)  is certified as an instructor;
(b)  has met the requirements for school operator status as established by the
division;
(c)  is authorized or certified to operate or manage a driver training school;
and
(d)  may supervise the work of another instructor.
